South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S458.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 16-11-600(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-11-600. (B) The owner or tenant of any lands may accomplish the posting of notice as follows: (1) by posting a notice in four conspicuous places on the borders of such land prohibiting entry thereon;  or (2) by enclosing the land with a fence; or (2) (3) by marking boundaries with a clearly visible purple-painted marking, consisting of one vertical line not less than eight inches in length and two inches in width, and the bottom of the mark not less than three nor more than six feet from the ground or normal water surface. These marks must be affixed to immovable, permanent objects that are not more than one hundred yards apart and readily visible to any person approaching the property. SECTION 2.  Section 16-11-620 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-11-620. (A) It is unlawful for any Any person whoto, without authorization, invitation, or legal cause or good excuse, knowingly enters enter into the dwelling house as defined by Section 16-11-10, place of business, or on the premises of another person after having been warned not to do so or any or structure of another person. (B) It is unlawful for any person towho, having entered into the dwelling house, place of business, or structure of another person, or on the premises of another person without having been warned fails and refuses, without good cause or good excuselegal cause, to leave immediately upon being ordered or requested to do so by the person in possession or his agent or representative. (C) A person violating the provisions of this section shall, on conviction, for a first offense, be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and fined not more than two hundred dollars or be imprisoned for not more than thirty days; for a second offense, be fined not more than five hundred dollars or be imprisoned for not more than ninety days; for a third and subsequent offense, be fined not more than one thousand dollars and be imprisoned for not more than one year. (D) All municipal courts of this State as well as those of magistrates may try and determine criminal cases involving violations of this section occurring within the respective limits of such municipalities and magisterial districts.  All peace officers of the State and its subdivisions shall enforce the provisions hereof within their respective jurisdictions. (E) The provisions of this section shall be construed as being in addition to, and not as superseding, any other statutes of the State relating to trespass or entry on lands of another. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----